Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.740

Payment of marketplace expenses—Use of private and federal funding.

In addition to any appropriated funds, the director may use private funding sources, including private foundation grants, to pay for marketplace expenses. On behalf of the marketplace, the department shall seek federal and private grants and is authorized to accept any funds awarded to the department for use in the marketplace.

[ 2015 c 296 s 5.]